nb: Krav til lagring: Frossen; Oppbevares frossen etter åpning; Oppbevares kjølig etter åpning; Kjølevare; Romtemperatur (lang holdbarhet); Annet
pl: Wymagania dotyczące przechowywania: Mrożone; Po otwarciu przechowywać w stanie zamrożonym; Po otwarciu przechowywać w lodówce; Chłodzone; Przechowywać w temperaturze pokojowej; Inne
el: Απαιτήσεις αποθήκευσης: Κατεψυγμένο; Διατήρηση στην κατάψυξη μετά το άνοιγμα; Διατήρηση στο ψυγείο μετά το άνοιγμα; Στο ψυγείο; Σταθερό σε θερμοκρασία περιβάλλοντος; Άλλο
bg-BG: Изисквания за съхранение: Замразен; Да се съхранява замразен след отваряне; Да се съхранява в хладилник след отваряне; Охладен; Дълготраен (стайна температура); Друго
fi: Säilytysvaatimukset: Pakastettu; Säilytettävä pakastettuna avaamisen jälkeen; Säilytettävä jääkaapissa avaamisen jälkeen; Kylmäsäilytys; Huoneenlämmössä säilyvä; Muu
ro-RO: Cerințe de depozitare: Congelat; A se păstra la congelator după deschidere; A se refrigera după deschidere; Refrigerat; Stabil la raft (condiții ambientale); Altele
sv: Förvaringskrav: Fryst; Förvaras fryst efter öppnande; Kyls efter öppnande; Kyld; Hyllstabil (rumstemperatur); Övrigt
hr-HR: Zahtjevi za pohranu: Smrznuto; Čuvati smrznuto nakon otvaranja; Staviti u hladnjak nakon otvaranja; Rashlađeno; Stabilno na sobnoj temperaturi; Ostalo
sk-SK: Požiadavky na skladovanie: Mrazené; Po otvorení uchovávajte v mraze; Po otvorení uchovávajte v chladničke; Chladené; Trvanlivé (pri izbovej teplote); Iné
zh-TW: 儲存要求: 冷凍; 開封後需冷凍; 開封後需冷藏; 冷藏; 常溫 (室溫); 其他
vi: Yêu cầu lưu trữ: Đông lạnh; Giữ đông lạnh sau khi mở; Bảo quản lạnh sau khi mở; Bảo quản lạnh; Ổn định ở nhiệt độ phòng; Khác
sl-SI: Zahteve glede shranjevanja: Zamrznjeno; Po odprtju hraniti zamrznjeno; Po odprtju hraniti v hladilniku; V hladilniku; Stabilno na polici (sobna temperatura); Drugo
zh-CN: 储存要求: 冷冻; 开封后保持冷冻; 开封后冷藏; 冷藏; 常温下耐保存; 其他
ko: 보관 요구 사항: 냉동 보관; 개봉 후 냉동 보관; 개봉 후 냉장 보관; 냉장 보관; 상온 보관; 기타
ja: 保管要件: 冷凍; 開封後は要冷凍; 開封後は要冷蔵; 冷蔵; 常温保存可能 (室温); その他
da: Opbevaringskrav: På frost; Opbevares på frost efter åbning; Opbevares på køl efter åbning; På køl; Hyldestabil (stuetemperatur); Andet
th: ข้อกำหนดในการจัดเก็บ: แช่แข็ง; แช่แข็งหลังจากเปิดใช้; แช่เย็นหลังจากเปิดใช้; แช่เย็น; เก็บที่อุณหภูมิห้อง (อุณหภูมิแวดล้อม); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Armazenamento requisitos: Congelado; Manter congelado após aberto; Refrigerar após aberto; Refrigerado; Temperatura ambiente; Outro
nl: Opslagvereisten: Bevroren; Na openen ingevroren bewaren; Na openen gekoeld bewaren; Gekoeld; Houdbaar buiten de koeling; Overig
de: Lagerungsanforderungen: Gefroren; Nach dem Öffnen tiefgekühlt aufbewahren; Nach dem Öffnen gekühlt aufbewahren; Gekühlt; Haltbar (Raumtemperatur); Andere
fr: Conditions de conservation: Congelé; Maintenir congelé après ouverture; Réfrigérer après ouverture; Réfrigéré; Longue conservation (ambiant); Autre
cs: Požadavky na skladování: Mražené; Po otevření uchovávejte zmrazené; Po otevření uchovávejte v chladničce; Chlazené; Skladovatelné při pokojové teplotě; Jiné
pt-PT: Requisitos de armazenamento: Congelado; Manter congelado após abertura; Refrigerar após abertura; Refrigerado; Estável à temperatura ambiente; Outro
es: Requisitos de almacenamiento: Congelado; Mantener congelado una vez abierto; Refrigerar una vez abierto; Refrigerado; No perecedero (ambiente); Otro
lt-LT: Laikymo reikalavimai: Šaldyta; Atidarius laikyti šaldiklyje; Atidarius laikyti šaldytuve; Atšaldyta; Stabilios laikymo sąlygos (kambario temperatūroje); Kita
tr: Depolama gereksinimleri: Dondurulmuş; Açıldıktan sonra dondurucuda saklayın; Açıldıktan sonra buzdolabında saklayın; Buzdolabında saklanmış; Oda sıcaklığında saklanabilir; Diğer
hu: Tárolási követelmények: Fagyasztott; Felbontás után fagyasztva tárolandó; Felbontás után hűtve tárolandó; Hűtött; Szobahőmérsékleten eltartható; Egyéb
ru: Требования к хранению: В замороженном виде; Хранить в замороженном виде после вскрытия; Хранить в холодильнике после вскрытия; В охлажденном виде; Стабильно при комнатной температуре; Другое
it: Requisiti di archiviazione: Surgelato; Conservare in freezer dopo l’apertura; Conservare in frigo dopo l’apertura; Refrigerato; A lunga conservazione (temperatura ambiente); Altro
en: Storage requirements: Frozen; Keep frozen after opening; Refrigerate after opening; Refrigerated; Shelf-stable (ambient); Other